Hawaii statutes.
[§428-1302] Penalties. (a) Each
limited liability company and foreign limited liability company that fails or
refuses to file its annual report for any year within the time prescribed by
this chapter shall be subject to a forfeiture of an amount to be determined by
the director not exceeding $100 for every such offense, violation, neglect, or
failure, to be recovered by action brought in the name of the State by the
director. A continuance of a failure to file the required statement shall be a
separate offense for each thirty days of the continuance. The director, for
good cause shown, may reduce or waive the penalty imposed by this section.

(b) Each limited liability company, domestic
or foreign, that delivers for filing to, files, or causes to be filed with the
director any record, statement, or other document required by this chapter
which is known to the limited liability company to be false in any material
respect, shall be guilty of a class C felony.

(c) Any person who signs or certifies as correct
any record, statement, or other document filed pursuant to this chapter,
knowing the same to be false in any material respect, shall be guilty of a
class C felony.

(d) Any person who negligently but without
intent to defraud signs or certifies as correct any record, statement, or other
document filed pursuant to this chapter, which is false in any material
particular, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding $500.

(e) Each domestic or foreign limited liability
company that knowingly fails or intentionally refuses to answer truthfully and
fully within the time prescribed by this chapter interrogatories directed to
the limited liability company by the director in accordance with this chapter
shall be guilty of a class C felony.

(f) Any manager or member of a domestic or
foreign limited liability company who knowingly fails or intentionally refuses
within the time prescribed by this chapter to answer truthfully and fully
interrogatories directed to the manager or member of a limited liability company
by the director in accordance with this chapter shall be guilty of a class C
felony.

(g) A person has "knowledge" of a
fact within the meaning of this section not only when the person has actual
knowledge, but also when the person has knowledge of the other facts as in the
circumstances showing bad faith. [L 1996, c 92, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next